Utah statutes.
31A-27a-602.   Proof of claim.
(1)  Proof of claim shall consist of a statement signed by the claimant or on
behalf of the claimant that includes all of the following that are applicable:
(a)  the particulars of the claim including the consideration given for the
claim;
(b)  the identity and amount of the security on the claim;
(c)  the payments made on the debt, if any;
(d)  that the sum claimed is justly owing and there is no setoff,
counterclaim, or defense to the claim;
(e)  any right of priority of payment or other specific right asserted by the
claimant;
(f)  the name and address of the claimant and the attorney, if any, who
represents the claimant; and
(g)  the claimant's Social Security number or federal employer identification
number.
(2)  The liquidator may require that:
(a)  a prescribed form be used under this section; and
(b)  other information and documents be included.
(3)  At any time the liquidator may:
(a)  require the claimant to present information or evidence supplementary to
that required under Subsection (1);
(b)  take testimony under oath;
(c)  require production of one or more affidavits or depositions; or
(d)  otherwise obtain additional information or evidence.
(4) (a)  An affected guaranty association may file a single omnibus proof of
claim for all claims of the affected guaranty association in connection with
payment of claims of the insurer.
(b)  The omnibus proof of claim may be periodically updated by the affected
guaranty association without regard to the deadline specified in Subsection
31A-27a-601(1).
(c)  An affected guaranty association may be required to submit a reasonable
amount of documentation in support of the claim.
